Hawaii statutes.
[§353-13.8]
Notice; waiver of notice; hearing on petition; waiver of
hearing on petition for involuntary hospitalization. (a) The court shall set a hearing on the petition, and notice of
the hearing shall be served personally on the person who is the subject of the
petition, or by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested,
deliverable to the addressee only; on the person's spouse, civil union partner,
or reciprocal beneficiary; legal parents; adult children; and legal guardian,
if one has been appointed. If the person has no living spouse, civil union
partner, or reciprocal beneficiary; legal parent; adult children; or legal
guardian, or if none can be found, notice of the hearing shall be served on at
least one of the person's closest adult relatives if any can be found. Notice
of the hearing shall also be served on the public defender, person's attorney,
or other court-appointed attorney, as the case may be. If the person is a
minor, notice of the hearing shall also be served upon the person who has had
the principal care and custody of the minor during the sixty days preceding the
date of the petition if the person can be found within the State. Notice shall
also be given to the other persons as the court may designate.

(b) The notice required by
subsection (a) shall include:

(1) The date, time, place of hearing, a clear
statement of the purpose of the proceedings and of possible consequences to the
person who is the subject of the petition, and a statement of the legal
standard upon which commitment is authorized;

(2) A copy of the petition;

(3) Written notice, in plain and simple language,
that the person may waive the hearing by voluntarily agreeing to the care or
treatment proposed;

(4) A completed form indicating the waiver described
in paragraph (3) if the person waived the hearing;

(5) Written notice, in plain and simple language,
that the person or the person's guardian or representative may apply at any
time for a hearing on the issue of the person's need for care or treatment if
the person has previously waived a hearing;

(6) Notice that the person is entitled to the
assistance of an attorney and that the public defender has been notified of
these proceedings;

(7) Notice that if the person does not want to be
represented by the public defender, the person may contact the person's own
attorney; and

(8) Notice, if applicable, that the petitioner
intends to present evidence to show that the person is an incapacitated or
protected person, or both, under article V of chapter 560, and whether the
appointment of a guardian is sought at the hearing. If appointment of a
guardian is to be recommended, and a nominee is known at the time the petition
is filed, the identity of the nominee shall be disclosed.

(c) If the person who is the
subject of the petition executes and files a waiver of the hearing, then upon
acceptance by the court following a court determination that the person
understands the person's rights and is competent to waive them, the court shall
order the person to be given the care or treatment as the court deems to be
proper under the circumstance. [L 2011, c 72, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next